Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1711
Seller-assisted marketing plan contract or contract, defined.

Seller-assisted marketing plan contract or contract shall mean any contract or agreement which obligates a purchaser to a seller.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 11.